test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-eemeed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - eemeed: # 1B v-k-v, VVCVV > VCV
    eemeed+N+Sg+Nom: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Gen: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Acc: eemeed
    eemeed+N+Sg+Ill: emedân
    eemeed+N+Sg+Loc: emedist
    eemeed+N+Sg+Com: emedáin
    eemeed+N+Sg+Abe: eemeedttáá
    eemeed+N+Ess: emedin
    eemeed+N+Par: emedid
    eemeed+N+Pl+Nom: emedeh
    eemeed+N+Pl+Gen: emedij
    eemeed+N+Pl+Acc: emedijd
    eemeed+N+Pl+Ill: emedáid
    eemeed+N+Pl+Loc: emedijn
    eemeed+N+Pl+Com: emedijguin
    eemeed+N+Pl+Abe: emedijttáá
